test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-kastid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - kästiđ: # ML checked

    kästiđ+V+Inf: kästiđ 
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: kastuđ
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kastuum
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kastuuh
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kástoo
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kástojeen
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kastuuvettee
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kastuv
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kastup
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kastuuvetteđ
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kástojeh
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kástojim
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kástojih
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kastui
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: kastuim
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: kastuid
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: kastuin
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kastuim
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kastuid
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kástojii
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: kastuuččim
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: kastuuččih
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: kastuuččij
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: kastuuččáim
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: kastuuččáid
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: kastuuččáin
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: kastuuččijm
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: kastuuččijd
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: kastuuččii
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: kastuužeem
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: kastuužeeh
#    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: kastuš
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: kastuužeen
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: kastušvettee
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: kastuužává
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: kastuužep
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: kastušvetteđ
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: kastuužeh
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kastuu
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kastum
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: kastuuččii
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: kastuužii
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: [kástojeijee, kástojijjee]
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: kastum
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: kastum
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: kastuumin
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: kastuumist
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: kastuumân
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ger: kastuudijn
    kästiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: kastuuhánnáá
    kästiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kastâdâm
    kästiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kastâdah
    kästiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kastâd
    kästiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kastâdeen
    kästiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kastâdvettee
    kästiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kastâdává
    kästiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kastâdeh
    kästiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kastâd
    kästiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kastâdim
    kästiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kastâdij
    kästiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kastâdii
    kästiđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: kastâdiččim
    kästiđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: kastâdičij
    kästiđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: kastâdižžeem
    kästiđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: kastâdiš
    kästiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kastâd
    kästiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kastâdâm
    kästiđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: kastâdižžii
    kästiđ+V+Der/d+V+PrfPrc: kastâdâm
    kästiđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: kastâdhánnáá
    kästiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Nom: kastâdem
    kästiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ill: kastâdmân
    kästiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ess: kastâdmin
    kästiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Loc: kastâdmist
    kästiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com: kastâddijn
    kästiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg1: kastâddijnân
    kästiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg2: kastâddijnâd
    kästiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg3: kastâddijnis
    kästiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: kastâddijn
    kästiđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kästistâm
    kästiđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kästittâm
    kästiđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kästiškuáđám
    kästiđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: kastâliđ
    kästiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kastâlâm
    kästiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kastâl
    kästiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kastâleen
    kästiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kastâleh
    kästiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kastâl
    kästiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kastâlim
    kästiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kastâlij
    kästiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kastâlii
